Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.350

Judgment, effect—Lien.

The judgment of the court shall have the effect of a separate judgment as to each tract or parcel of land or other property assessed, and any appeal from such judgment shall not invalidate or delay the judgment except as to the property concerning which the appeal is taken. Such judgment shall be a lien upon the property assessed from the date thereof until payment shall be made, and said lien shall be paramount and superior to any other lien or encumbrance whatsoever, theretofore or thereafter created, except a lien for assessments for general taxes.

[ 1915 c 154 s 4; 1907 c 153 s 30; RRS s 9244. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 30; 1893 c 84 s 30.]